Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8486. WILLIAMSON COUNTY WATER, SEWER, IRRIGATION, AND DRAINAGE DISTRICT NO. 3

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8486.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the Williamson County Water, Sewer, Irrigation, and Drainage District No. 3.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 8486.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district in Williamson County, created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 8486.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the boundaries of the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(c) The creation of the district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 8486.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 3, Chapter 650, Acts of the 70th Legislature, Regular Session, 1987, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter H, Chapter 54, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

(b) The boundaries and field notes of the district form a closure. A mistake in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect:

(1) the district's organization, existence, or validity;

(2) the district's right to impose a tax; or

(3) the legality or operation of the district or its governing body.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8486.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The district is governed by a board of five elected directors.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 8486.052. BOARD VACANCY. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a vacancy in the office of director shall be filled in the manner provided by Section 49.105, Water Code.

(b) The Texas Commission on Environmental Quality shall appoint directors to fill all of the vacancies on the board whenever the number of qualified directors is fewer than three.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8486.101. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, duties, and functions provided by general law applicable to a municipal utility district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49, 50, and 54, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.